fr: Type de découpe des pommes de terre: Grenailles (petites entières); Brossées entières; En dés; Frites en julienne; En tranches; Lavées entières; Quartiers; Entières; Autre
ro-RO: Stilul de tăiere a cartofilor: Baby (mici, întregi); Întregi, curățați cu peria; Cubulețe; Cartofi pai (julienne); Feliați; Întregi, spălați; Cartofi wedges; Întregi; Altele
ja: ポテトカットスタイル: ベビー (小粒丸ごと); ブラッシング済み丸ごと; 角切り; 細切りフライ; スライス; 水洗い済み丸ごと; ウェッジカット; 丸ごと; その他
th: สไตล์การหั่นมันฝรั่ง: ลูกเล็ก (เต็มลูกขนาดเล็ก); ขัดผิวเต็มลูก; หั่นเต๋า; หั่นแท่ง; ฝานแผ่น; ล้างน้ำเต็มลูก; หั่นเสี้ยว; เต็มลูก; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Bulvių pjaustymo tipas: Mažos (nepjaustytos); Nuvalytos nepjaustytos; Kubeliais; Šiaudeliais; Griežinėliais; Nuplautos nepjaustytos; Skiltelėmis; Nepjaustytos; Kita
tr: Patates kesim tarzı: Bebek (küçük bütün); Fırçalanmış bütün; Küp doğranmış; Jülyen patates kızartması; Dilimlenmiş; Yıkanmış bütün; Elma dilim; Bütün; Diğer
bg-BG: Стил на рязане на картофи: Бейби (малки цели); Изчеткани цели; На кубчета; Жулиени; На шайби; Измити цели; Резенчета; Цели; Друго
ru: Тип нарезки картофеля: Беби-картофель (мелкий целый); Очищенный щеткой целый; Нарезанный кубиками; Картофель фри (соломкой); Нарезанный ломтиками; Мытый целый; Картофель по-деревенски (дольками); Целый; Другое
sk-SK: Štýl nakrájania zemiakov: Baby (malé celé); Kefované celé; Na kocky; Hranolčeky julienne; Na plátky; Umyté celé; Americké zemiaky; Celé; Iné
pt-PT: Tipo de corte da batata: Bebé (pequena inteira); Escovada inteira; Em cubos; Batatas fritas em juliana; Fatiada; Lavada inteira; Em gomos; Inteira; Outro
da: Kartoffeludskæringsstil: Babykartofler (små, hele); Børstede, hele; I tern; Julienne; I skiver; Vaskede, hele; Både; Hele; Andet
pt-BR: Batata tipo de corte: Bolinha (pequena inteira); Inteira escovada; Em cubos; Fritas julienne; Fatiada; Inteira lavada; Canoa; Inteira; Outros
es: Estilo de corte de las papas: Baby (entera pequeña); Entera cepillada; En cubos; Papas fritas en juliana; En rodajas; Entera lavada; En gajos; Entera; Otro
hu: Burgonya vágási típusa: Bébi (kicsi, egész); Kefélt egész; Kockázott; Julienne sültkrumpli; Szeletelt; Mosott egész; Gerezd; Egész; Egyéb
cs: Styl řezu brambor: Baby (malé celé); Celé, kartáčované; Kostky; Hranolky Julienne; Plátky; Celé, prané; Měsíčky; Celé; Jiné
sl-SI: Stil rezanja krompirja: Mladi (majhni celi); Oščetkani celi; Na kocke; Julienne (na rezance); Na rezine; Oprani celi; Na krhlje; Celi; Drugo
nb: Kuttestil for potet: Mini (små hele); Børstede hele; I terninger; Julienne-fries; I skiver; Vaskede hele; Båter; Hele; Annet
el: Τρόπος κοπής της πατάτας: Baby (μικρές ολόκληρες); Βουρτσισμένες ολόκληρες; Σε κύβους; Τηγανητές ζουλιέν; Σε φέτες; Πλυμένες ολόκληρες; Κυδωνάτες; Ολόκληρες; Άλλο
hr-HR: Stil rezanja krumpira: Mladi krumpir (mali cijeli); Četkani cijeli; Narezan na kockice; Julienne krumpirići; Narezan na ploške; Oprani cijeli; Pekarski krumpir; Cijeli; Ostalo
zh-TW: 馬鈴薯切割款式: 迷你 (小顆全顆); 刷洗全顆; 塊狀; 細長薯條; 片狀; 水洗全顆; 楔形薯角; 全顆; 其他
it: Stile di taglio delle patate: Novelle (piccole intere); Intere spazzolate; A cubetti; Patatine alla julienne; A fette; Intere lavate; A spicchi; Intere; Altro
nl: Aardappel snijstijl: Krieltjes (klein en heel); Geborsteld en heel; In blokjes; Julienne frites; In plakjes; Gewassen en heel; Partjes; Heel; Overig
pl: Styl krojenia ziemniaków: Młode ziemniaki (małe całe); Szczotkowane w całości; W kostkę; Frytki julienne; W plastrach; Myte w całości; Łódeczki; W całości; Inne
fi: Perunan leikkaustyyli: Pieni (kokonainen); Harjattu kokonainen; Kuutioitu; Ohuet ranskalaiset (julienne); Viipaloitu; Pesty kokonainen; Lohkot; Kokonainen; Muu
de: Schnittart der Kartoffeln: Baby (klein, ganz); Gebürstet, ganz; Gewürfelt; Julienne-Pommes; In Scheiben; Gewaschen, ganz; Wedges; Ganz; Sonstige
vi: Kiểu cắt khoai tây: Bi (nguyên củ nhỏ); Nguyên củ được chải sạch; Cắt khối vuông; Cắt sợi dài; Cắt lát; Nguyên củ được rửa sạch; Cắt múi cau; Nguyên củ; Khác
sv: Typ av potatisskärning: Baby (små hela); Borstade hela; Tärnade; Juliennestrimlade/pommes frites; Skivade; Tvättade hela; Klyftor; Hela; Annat
en: Potato cut style: Baby (small whole); Brushed whole; Cubed; Julienne fries; Sliced; Washed whole; Wedges; Whole; Other
ko: 감자 절단 방식: 알감자(작은 통감자); 브러시 처리된 통감자; 깍둑썰기; 채썰기 프라이; 슬라이스; 세척된 통감자; 웨지; 통감자; 기타
zh-CN: 马铃薯切法: 迷你（小个完整）; 毛刷清洁完整; 块状; 细条; 切片; 水洗完整; 薯角; 完整; 其他